test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tooqdw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tǭʼdõ: # Verb 2 'eng /est tuua/fin' - full paradigm
     tǭʼdõ+V+Inf: [tǭʼdõ, tǭdõ]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Ger: [tǭʼdsõ, tǭdsõ]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Ger: [tǭʼdsõ, tǭdsõ]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Sup: [tǭʼmõ, tǭmõ]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Sup+Ine: [tǭʼmõõs, tǭmõõs]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Sup+Ela: [tǭʼmõõst, tǭmõõst]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Sup+Tra: [tǭʼmõõks, tǭmõõks]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Sup+Abe: [tǭʼmõõt, tǭmõõt]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [tǭʼb, tǭb]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [tǭʼtõ, tǭtõ]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [tǭʼbõd, tǭbõd]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [tǭʼž, tǭž]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tǭʼžtõ, tǭžtõ]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tǭʼžtõ, tǭžtõ]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [tǭʼ, tǭ]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [tǭʼks, tǭks]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [tǭʼ, tǭ]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [tǭʼ, tǭ]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [tǭʼgid, tǭgid]
     tǭʼdõ+V+Jus+Sg3: [tǭʼgõ, tǭgõ]
     tǭʼdõ+V+QuoSg3: [tǭʼji, tǭji]
     tǭʼdõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [tǭʼnd, tǭnd]
     tǭʼdõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [tǭʼdõd, tǭdõd]
